South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4680.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-1538(H) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (H) A person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of the misdemeanor of endangering emergency services personnel or operators of authorized emergency vehicles and, upon conviction, must be fined not less than three hundred dollars nor more than fivethree hundred dollars. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----